Utah statutes.
58-37f-401.   Database registration required -- Penalties for failure to register.

(1)  Each individual, other than a veterinarian, who, on June 30, 2010, has a license to prescribe a controlled substance under Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, but is not registered with the division to use the database shall, on or before September 30, 2010, register with the division to use the database.

(2)  Each individual who, on November 1, 2012, is registered with the division to use the database shall, on or before January 1, 2013, participate in the online tutorial and pass the online test described in Section 58-37f-402.

(3) (a)  An individual who is not a veterinarian, who obtains a new license to prescribe a controlled substance under Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, shall, within 30 days after the day on which the individual obtains a license to prescribe a controlled substance from the Drug Enforcement Administration, register with the division to use the database.

(b)  An individual who is not a veterinarian may not renew a license to prescribe a controlled substance under Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act, unless the individual registers with the division to use the database.

(4)  Beginning on November 2, 2012, in order to register to use the database, the individual registering must participate in the online tutorial and pass the online test described in Section 58-37f-402.

(5)  Failure by an individual to comply with the requirements of this section is grounds for the division to take the following actions in accordance with Section 58-1-401:

(a)  refuse to issue a license to the individual;

(b)  refuse to renew the individual's license; or

(c)  revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation the license.

(6)  Beginning on July 1, 2010, the division shall, in accordance with Section 63J-1-504, impose an annual database registration fee on an individual who registers to use the database, to pay the startup and ongoing costs of the division for complying with the requirements of this section and Section 58-37f-402.



Amended by Chapter 23, 2011 General Session

